Washington statutes.
RCW 28C.04.600

AIDS information—Vocational schools.

Each publicly operated vocational school shall make information available to all newly matriculated students on methods of transmission of the human immunodeficiency virus and prevention of acquired immunodeficiency syndrome. The curricula and materials shall be reviewed for medical accuracy by the office on AIDS in coordination with the appropriate regional AIDS service network.

[ 1988 c 206 s 503.]